District of Columbia statutes.
29-801.08

Operating agreement; effect on limited liability company and persons becoming members; preformation agreement.

(a)

A limited liability company shall be bound by, and may enforce, the operating agreement, whether or not the company has itself manifested assent to the operating agreement.

(b)

A person that becomes a member of a limited liability company shall be deemed to assent to the operating agreement.

(c)

Two or more persons intending to become the initial members of a limited liability company may make an agreement providing that upon the formation of the company the agreement will become the operating agreement. One person intending to become the initial member of a limited liability company may assent to terms providing that, upon the formation of the company, the terms will become the operating agreement.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720

Section References

This section is referenced in § 29-801.07.

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 111 of the Uniform Limited Company Act (2006 Act).